Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8601
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-8601 to 44-8608 shall be known and may be cited as the Insured Homeowners Protection Act.

Laws 2012, LB943, § 1;

Laws 2018, LB743, § 30.